North Dakota, session 69, SB2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-26-11. License of insurance producer - Lines of insurance.
An insurance producer or surplus lines insurance producer may receive a license to market
products under one or more of the following lines:
1. Life and annuity means insurance coverage on human lives, including benefits of endowment,
fixed and indexed annuities, and credit life.
2. Accident and health or sickness means insurance coverage for sickness, disease, injury,
accidental death, and disability.
3. Property means insurance coverage for direct and consequential loss of or damage to
property of every kind.
4. Casualty means insurance coverage against legal liability, including that for death, injury, or
disability or damage to real or personal property.
5. Variable life and variable annuity means insurance coverage provided under variable life
insurance contracts and variable annuities.
The product types found under each of the above lines of insurance are those adopted pursuant to
section 26.1-05-02.1.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
26.1-26-22. Nonresident proceedingProceedings by commissioner - Service of process -
Procedure.
The commissioner shall serve process upon any nonresident licensee in any action or proceeding
instituted by the commissioner under this chapter by mailing the process by registered mail return
receipt requestedelectronic mail to the electronic mail address maintained as required under section
26.1 - 26 - 33.1 or United States mai l to the licensee at the licensee's last-known address of record or
principal place of business. Service of process under this section is complete upon electronic mailing or
United States mailing.

S. B. NO. 2125 - PAGE 2
SECTION 3. Section 26.1-26-33.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
26.1 - 26 - 33.1. Notification of electronic mailing address used by regulator .
An insurance producer shall maintain an electronic mailing address for regulatory use. It is an
insurance producer's sole responsibility to continually monitor the electronic mailing address for
regulatory communications from the commissioner.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26-42.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-26-42.1. Revocation of nonresident license.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 13 of section 26.1-26-42, any nonresident license
issued pursuant to this chapter may be suspended or revoked without notice and hearing to the
licensee and without proceeding in conformity with chapter 28-32, upon evidence that the resident
license of the North Dakota nonresident licensee has been revoked or suspended or sixty days after the
commissioner receives notification that the producer's license is past the renewal deadline in the
producer's resident home state. This evidence may be in the form of a certified copy or by electronic
mail, or through the insurance producer database maintained by the national association of insurance
producers, its affiliates, or subsidiaries.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26.8-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-26.8-09. License - Renewal - Reinstatement.
1. The commissioner shall issue a resident public adjuster license or nonresident public adjuster
license to an individual who meets the necessary requirements of this chapter.
a. A resident public adjuster license and a nonresident public adjuster license expire on the
last day of the month of the licensed public adjuster's birthday following the two-year
anniversary of issuance of a license by the commissioner.
b. To renew a license, a licensed resident public adjuster and a licensed nonresident public
adjuster shall file a biennial license continuation in the form and manner prescribed by
the commissioner and pay a fee of twenty-five dollars. The commissioner shall give a
licensee at least sixtyninety days' notice of the biennial license continuation filing
deadline. A resident public adjuster or a nonresident public adjuster who allows the
license to lapse may, within the twelve-month period immediately following the expiration
date, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination,
upon payment of a reinstatement fee, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars,
prescribed by the commissioner in addition to the renewal fee.
c. The commissioner may grant an individual licensee who is unable to comply with license
renewal procedures due to military service or some other extenuating circumstance,
including a long-term medical disability, a waiver of an examination requirement or a fine,
fee, or sanction imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.
2. The commissioner shall issue a business entity public adjuster license to a business entity that
meets the necessary requirements of this chapter.
a. A business entity public adjuster license expires on the last day of the month following
the two-year anniversary of issuance of a license by the commissioner.
b. To renew a license, a licensed business entity public adjuster shall file a biennial license
continuation in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.

S. B. NO. 2125 - PAGE 3
c. A business entity public adjuster license may be renewed within the ninety-day period
immediately preceding the expiration date upon payment of the renewal fee, not to
exceed one hundred fifty dollars, prescribed by the commissioner. A business entity
public adjuster that allows the license to lapse may, within the thirty-day period
immediately following the expiration date, renew the same license upon payment of a
late renewal fee, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars, prescribed by the
commissioner in addition to the renewal fee.
d. A business entity public adjuster license renewed within the thirty-day period immediately
following the expiration date pursuant to this section is deemed to have been renewed
before the expiration date.
3. A license issued pursuant to this chapter must contain the licensee's name, mailing address,
and license number; the date of issuance; the lines of authority; the expiration date; and any
information the commissioner deems necessary.
4. Within thirty days after the change, a licensee shall inform the commissioner, by any means
acceptable to the commissioner, of a change of legal name, mailing address, or other
information submitted on the application.
a. A licensee who fails to provide this notification of change is subject to a fine by the
commissioner of not more than five hundred dollars per violation, suspension of the
license until the change is reported to the commissioner, or both.
b. A licensee doing business under a name other than the licensee's legal name shall notify
the commissioner before using the assumed name.
5. A licensee is subject to the provisions of chapter 26.1-04.
6. A licensee shall report to the commissioner any administrative action taken against the
licensee in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within thirty
days of the final disposition of the matter. The report must include a copy of the order, consent
to order, or other relevant legal documents.
7. Within thirty days after a criminal conviction, a licensee shall report to the commissioner any
criminal conviction of the licensee taken in any jurisdiction. The report must include a copy of
the initial complaint, the order issued by the court, and any other relevant legal documents.
8. The commissioner may contract with nongovernmental entities, including the national
association of insurance commissioners, or affiliates or subsidiaries the national association
oversees, to perform ministerial functions, including the collection of fees, related to the
administration of this chapter.
9. The commissioner may adopt rules establishing license renewal procedures.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26.8-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-26.8-11. Proof of bond or insurance.
1. At the time of issuance of a resident public adjuster license or a nonresident public adjuster
license and for the duration of the license, an applicant shall maintain a surety bond or proof of
insurance satisfactory to the commissioner for the use and benefit of the commissioner for
insureds that have remitted fees, retainers, compensation, deposits, or other things of value to
the public adjuster in the course of the public adjuster's business. The bond:
a. Must be a minimum of twenty thousand dollars; and

S. B. NO. 2125 - PAGE 4
b. May not be terminated by the surety company or public adjuster unless written notice has
been filed with the commissioner and submitted to the public adjuster at least sixtythirty
days before the termination.
2. The commissioner may request the evidence of financial responsibility at any time the
commissioner deems relevant.
3. A public adjuster immediately shall notify the commissioner if evidence of financial
responsibility terminates or becomes impaired. The authority to act as a public adjuster
automatically terminates if the evidence of financial responsibility terminates or becomes
impaired.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-26.8-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-26.8-12. Continuing education.
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual who holds a resident public adjuster
license or a nonresident public adjuster license shall satisfactorily complete a minimum of
twenty-four credits of continuing education, including three credits of ethics, reported on a
biennial basis in conjunction with the license renewal cycle. Credits for continuing education
courses attended in any one year over the minimum number of hours of education required,
not to exceed twelve hours, may be credited to the year next preceding the year in which the
credits were earned or to the year next following the year in which the credits were earned.
Report of continuing education must be made at the end of a two-year period. The
commissioner may provide a one-time extension of the two-year reporting requirement, not to
exceed thirty-six months, if additional time is necessary to implement the transition to reporting
continuing education by the last day of the birth month.
2. The requirements of subsection 1 do not apply to a nonresident public adjuster who has met
the continuing education requirements of the adjuster's home state and whose home state
gives credit to residents of this state on the same basis.
3. The commissioner shall provide by rule for reporting by the last day of the birth month of
compliance with the continuing education requirements of this section.
4. The commissioner shall adopt by rule criteria for the accreditation of courses for continuing
education. Applications for accreditation of a continuing education course offered in this state
must be submitted to the commissioner within the time provided by rule and on forms
established by rule and with a fee of fifty dollars. The commissioner shall make a final
determination as to accreditation and assignment of credit-hours for continuing education
courses.

S. B. NO. 2125 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2125.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State